Illinois, session 104th, SB2791.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings and purpose. The General Assembly 5finds that the use of hand-held electronic communication 6devices by drivers has led to preventable crashes, injuries, 7and deaths. The purpose of this Act is to enhance public safety 8by expanding current policies concerning hand-held electronic 9communication device use, increasing penalties, and promoting 10education to end distracted driving. 11    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 12changing Section 12-610.2 as follows: 13    (625 ILCS 5/12-610.2)14    Sec. 12-610.2. Electronic communication devices.15    (a) As used in this Section:16    "Electronic communication device" means an electronic 17device capable of text messaging, emailing, Internet browsing, 18or voice communication, including, but not limited to, a 19hand-held wireless telephone, hand-held personal digital 20assistant, tablet, or a portable or mobile computer. 21"Electronic communication device" , but does not include a 22global positioning system or navigation system, or a device   SB2791- 2 -LRB104 16650 LNS 30054 b1that is physically or electronically integrated into the motor 2vehicle, or an electronic feature preinstalled in the vehicle 3itself, such as a touch screen or CarPlay.4    "Emergency" means a situation where there is an immediate, 5imminent risk to health or safety, requiring communication 6with law enforcement, medical, or emergency services.7    "Hands-free mode" means the use of an electronic 8communication device without the use of either hand, except to 9activate or deactivate a function with a single touch, and 10with the device mounted or resting in a fixed location.11    "Operating a motor vehicle" means driving or being in 12actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a public road, 13including times when the vehicle is temporarily stationary due 14to traffic, a traffic control device, or other momentary 15delays. "Operating a motor vehicle" does not include a vehicle 16stopped at a red light, so long as the use of the electronic 17device does not exceed the amount of time that the light is 18red. 19    (b) A person may not operate a motor vehicle on a roadway 20while manually using an electronic communication device, 21including using an electronic communication device to watch, 22record, or stream video, participate in any video conferencing 23application, including, but not limited to, Zoom, Microsoft 24Teams, or WebEx, or access any social media site, including, 25but not limited to, Facebook, Snapchat, Instagram, or Twitter, 26holding a device in one's hand or lap, composing, sending, or   SB2791- 3 -LRB104 16650 LNS 30054 b1reading any text-based communication, or browsing the 2Internet. The exemptions in paragraphs (3) and (9) of 3subsection (d) do not apply when a person is using the 4electronic communication device to watch, record, or stream 5video, participate in any video conferencing application, or 6access any social media site.7    A driver is presumed to be in violation of this subsection 8if the electronic communication device is observed in the 9person's hand while the vehicle is in motion or stopped in 10traffic. 11    (b-5) A person commits aggravated use of an electronic 12communication device when he or she violates subsection (b) 13and in committing the violation he or she is involved in a 14motor vehicle crash that results in great bodily harm, 15permanent disability, disfigurement, or death to another and 16the violation is a proximate cause of the injury or death. 17    (c) A violation of this Section is an offense against 18traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles. A 19person who violates this Section shall be fined a maximum of 20$75 for a first offense, $100 for a second offense, $125 for a 21third offense, and $150 for a fourth or subsequent offense, 22except that a person who violates subsection (b-5) shall be 23assessed a minimum fine of $1,000. A person who violates 24subsection (b) commits a petty offense with the following 25penalties: 26        (1) For a first offense, a fine not to exceed $250. The   SB2791- 4 -LRB104 16650 LNS 30054 b1    offense shall be recorded as a moving violation and 2    reported to the Secretary of State.3        (2) For a second offense within 12 months of a first 4    offense, a fine not to exceed $500. The person shall be 5    required to complete an approved Distracted Driving Safety 6    Course at the person's own cost. Failure to complete the 7    course within 90 days shall result in a suspension of the 8    person's driver's license until the course is complete.9        (3) For a third or subsequent offense within 12 months 10    of a first offense, a fine not to exceed $750. The 11    Secretary of State shall also suspend the driver's license 12    of the person for a period of not less than 3 months and 13    not more than 6 months. 14    (d) This Section does not apply to:15        (1) a law enforcement officer or operator of an 16    emergency vehicle while performing his or her official 17    duties;18        (1.5) a first responder, including a volunteer first 19    responder, while operating his or her own personal motor 20    vehicle using an electronic communication device for the 21    sole purpose of receiving information about an emergency 22    situation while en route to performing his or her official 23    duties; 24        (1.7) a public transit or commercial driver using a 25    digital dispatch device within the scope of employment; 26        (2) a driver using an electronic communication device   SB2791- 5 -LRB104 16650 LNS 30054 b1    for the sole purpose of reporting an emergency situation 2    and continued communication with emergency personnel 3    during the emergency situation;4        (3) a driver who is 18 or older using an electronic 5    communication device in hands-free or voice-operated mode, 6    which may include the use of a headset, such as using a 7    speakerphone or Bluetooth, listening to music or podcasts, 8    or using a global positioning system or other digital map;9        (4) a driver of a commercial motor vehicle reading a 10    message displayed on a permanently installed communication 11    device designed for a commercial motor vehicle with a 12    screen that does not exceed 10 inches tall by 10 inches 13    wide in size; 14        (5) a driver using an electronic communication device 15    while parked on the shoulder of a roadway;16        (6) a driver using an electronic communication device 17    when the vehicle is stopped due to normal traffic being 18    obstructed and the driver has the motor vehicle 19    transmission in neutral or park;20        (6.5) a driver using the phone for a brief, specific 21    purpose while the vehicle is fully and completely stopped 22    at a red light, as long as the purpose is achieved and the 23    electronic communication device use ceases before the 24    light turns green; 25        (7) a driver using two-way or citizens band radio 26    services;   SB2791- 6 -LRB104 16650 LNS 30054 b1        (8) a driver using two-way mobile radio transmitters 2    or receivers for licensees of the Federal Communications 3    Commission in the amateur radio service; 4        (9) a driver using an electronic communication device 5    by pressing a single button to initiate or terminate a 6    voice communication; or 7        (10) a driver using an electronic communication device 8    capable of performing multiple functions, other than a 9    hand-held wireless telephone or hand-held personal digital 10    assistant (for example, a fleet management system, 11    dispatching device, citizens band radio, or music player) 12    for a purpose that is not otherwise prohibited by this 13    Section. 14    These exceptions shall be narrowly construed and the 15burden of proof shall be on the driver to show that an 16exception applies. 17    (e) A person convicted of violating subsection (b-5) 18commits a Class A misdemeanor if the violation resulted in 19great bodily harm, permanent disability, or disfigurement to 20another. A person convicted of violating subsection (b-5) 21commits a Class 4 felony if the violation resulted in the death 22of another person. 23    (f) This Section shall be enforced by State and local law 24enforcement agencies. A police officer who observes a 25violation may stop and issue a citation to the driver. In 26addition, a municipality is authorized to establish an   SB2791- 7 -LRB104 16650 LNS 30054 b1automated distracted driving enforcement program as follows:2        (1) A municipality, in coordination with the 3    Department of Transportation and Illinois State Police, 4    may deploy automated traffic cameras or devices to detect 5    and record violations of this Section. The automated 6    traffic cameras or devices may be mounted on toll plazas, 7    overpasses, police vehicles, or other fixed locations and 8    shall capture photographic or video evidence of the 9    offense, such as images of the driver holding a phone 10    while looking away from the road.11        (2) Within 30 days of a violation, the registered 12    owner of the vehicle shall be mailed a citation, including 13    the images and details of the offense. The citation shall 14    carry the same fine and record consequences as a standard 15    violation. The owner may contest the citation pursuant to 16    procedures set by the municipality, including by showing 17    that the owner was not driving, that the owner is subject 18    to an exemption, or that no violation occurred.19        (3) Photos or videos obtained through a program shall 20    be used exclusively for enforcing this Section and shall 21    not be retained longer than 90 days if no violation is 22    recorded. All images of vehicle occupants not relevant to 23    the offense shall be pixelated or obscured to protect 24    privacy. All photos and videos obtained through a program 25    shall be reviewed by a trained law enforcement officer 26    prior to citation issuance to ensure accuracy and minimize   SB2791- 8 -LRB104 16650 LNS 30054 b1    wrongful citations due to technological or artificial 2    intelligence error.3        (4) The local law enforcement agency shall oversee a 4    program, and an annual report shall be provided to the 5    municipality detailing the number of citations issued, the 6    locations of cameras, and any measurable impact on crash 7    rates.8    Nothing in this subsection prohibits State-authorized 9automated enforcement as provided by future State law. A 10program shall become operative only upon confirmation that it 11does not conflict with State law or upon the enactment of 12enabling legislation by the General Assembly.13    (g) The Department of Transportation and the Secretary of 14State, in coordination with municipalities and other 15stakeholders, shall implement a distracted driving awareness 16campaign. Elements of the campaign shall include:17        (1) The posting of signs on major roadways notifying 18    drivers of the provisions of this Section and the 19    penalties for violation of this Section.20        (2) Outreach to driver education programs and schools 21    to incorporate distracted driving material in their 22    instruction and exams.23        (3) Public service announcements via local media, 24    social media, and other channels to inform the public 25    about the dangers of distracted driving and the new 26    enforcement efforts.  SB2791- 9 -LRB104 16650 LNS 30054 b1        (4) Partnerships with law enforcement to publicize 2    periods of heightened enforcement, such as a "distracted 3    driving crackdown week".4    The campaign shall continue at least through the first 5year following the effective date of this amendatory Act of 6the 104th General Assembly, with periodic reinforcement 7thereafter pending data demonstrating the campaign's 8effectiveness, such as any measurable decrease in distracted 9driving violations over the preceding year. 10(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 11103-310, eff. 1-1-24.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 131, 2027.